pt-PT: Saúde e beleza > Cuidados de saúde > Sistemas de alarme médicos: Sistemas de alarme de saída de cama; Sistemas de chamada para cuidadores; Sistemas de alarme de saída de cadeira; Sistemas de alarme de tapete de chão; Relógios de alarme médico; Dispositivos de alerta médico pessoal
ko: 건강/미용 > 건강 관리 > 의료용 알람 시스템: 침대 이탈 경보 시스템; 간병인 호출 시스템; 의자 이탈 경보 시스템; 바닥 매트 경보 시스템; 의료용 경보 시계; 개인 의료 경보 장치
hr-HR: Zdravlje i ljepota > Briga za zdravlje > Sustavi medicinskih alarma: Alarmni sustavi za izlazak iz kreveta; Dojavni sustavi za njegovatelje; Alarmni sustavi za izlazak iz stolice; Alarmni sustavi s podnim prostirkama; Medicinski alarmni satovi; Osobni medicinski alarmni uređaji
es: Salud y belleza > Cuidado de la salud > Sistemas de alarma médica: Sistemas de alarma de salida de cama; Sistemas de buscapersonas para cuidadores; Sistemas de alarma de salida de silla; Sistemas de alarma con tapete de piso; Relojes de alarma médica; Dispositivos personales de alerta médica
tr: Sağlık ve Güzellik > Sağlık Bakım > Medikal Alarm Sistemleri: Yatak Çıkış Alarm Sistemleri; Bakıcı Çağrı Sistemleri; Sandalye Çıkış Alarm Sistemleri; Zemin Paspası Alarm Sistemleri; Tıbbi Alarm Saatleri; Kişisel Tıbbi Acil Durum Cihazları
fi: Terveys ja kauneus > Terveydenhoito > Lääketieteelliset varoitusjärjestelmät: Sängyn poistumishälytinjärjestelmä; Hoitajan kutsulaite; Tuolin poistumishälytinjärjestelmä; Lattiamattohälytinjärjestelmä; Lääkinnällinen hälytinrannekello; Henkilökohtainen lääkinnällinen hälytin
th: สุขภาพและความงาม > การดูแลสุขภาพ > ระบบสัญญาณเตือนทางการแพทย์: ระบบสัญญาณเตือนการลุกจากเตียง; ระบบเรียกผู้ดูแล; ระบบสัญญาณเตือนการลุกจากเก้าอี้; ระบบสัญญาณเตือนแบบเสื่อรองพื้น; นาฬิกาสัญญาณเตือนฉุกเฉินทางการแพทย์; อุปกรณ์แจ้งเตือนฉุกเฉินทางการแพทย์ส่วนบุคคล
pt-BR: Saúde e beleza > Cuidados com a saúde > Sistemas de alarme hospitalar: Sistemas de alarme de saída de cama; Sistemas de pager para cuidadores; Sistemas de alarme de saída de cadeira; Sistemas de alarme de tapete de chão; Relógios com alarme médico; Dispositivos de alerta médico pessoal
zh-CN: 保健/美容/卫生/护理 > 医疗保健 > 医疗报警系统: 床边离床报警系统; 护理员呼叫系统; 椅子离座报警系统; 地垫报警系统; 医疗报警手表; 个人医疗报警设备
it: Salute e bellezza > Salute > Sistemi di allarme medici: Sistemi di allarme di uscita dal letto; Sistemi di cercapersone per caregiver; Sistemi di allarme di uscita dalla sedia; Sistemi di allarme con tappetino per pavimento; Orologi di allarme medico; Dispositivi personali di avviso medico
da: Sundhed og skønhed > Sundhedspleje > Medicinske alarmsystemer: Sengeudgangsalarmer; Plejer-pager-systemer; Stoleudgangsalarmer; Gulvmåtte-alarmsystemer; Medicinske alarmarmbåndsure; Personlige medicinske alarmenheder
fr: Santé et beauté > Santé > Systèmes d’alarme médicale: Systèmes d’alarme de sortie de lit; Systèmes d’appel pour aidants; Systèmes d’alarme de sortie de chaise; Systèmes d’alarme à tapis de sol; Montres d’alarme médicale; Dispositifs d’alerte médicale personnelle
bg-BG: Здраве и красота > Грижа за здравето > Медицински алармени системи: Алармени системи за излизане от легло; Системи за повикване на болногледач; Алармени системи за излизане от стол; Алармени системи за подова постелка; Медицински алармени часовници; Медицински алармени устройства за лична употреба
ru: Красота и здоровье > Медицинские товары > Системы вызова неотложной медпомощи: Системы сигнализации покидания кровати; Пейджерные системы для ухаживающих лиц; Системы сигнализации покидания кресла; Системы сигнализации напольных ковриков; Медицинские сигнальные часы; Персональные медицинские устройства оповещения
pl: Zdrowie i uroda > Opieka zdrowotna > Systemy alarmów medycznych: Systemy alarmowe opuszczenia łóżka; Systemy przywoławcze dla opiekunów; Systemy alarmowe opuszczenia krzesła; Systemy alarmowe z matami podłogowymi; Medyczne zegarki alarmowe; Osobiste alarmy medyczne
cs: Zdraví a krása > Zdravotní péče > Zdravotnické alarmy: Alarmové systémy pro výstup z postele; Pagerové systémy pro pečovatele; Alarmové systémy pro výstup ze židle; Alarmové systémy s podložkou na podlahu; Zdravotní alarmové hodinky; Osobní zdravotní tísňová zařízení
de: Gesundheit & Schönheit > Gesundheitspflege > Hausnotrufgeräte: Bettausstiegsalarmsysteme; Pflege-Pager-Systeme; Stuhlausstiegs-Alarmsysteme; Fußmatten-Alarmsysteme; Medizinische Alarmuhren; Persönliche medizinische Alarmgeräte
vi: Sức khỏe và sắc đẹp > Chăm sóc sức khỏe > Hệ thống cảnh báo y tế: Hệ thống báo động xuống giường; Hệ thống gọi người chăm sóc; Hệ thống báo động xuống ghế; Hệ thống báo động thảm sàn; Đồng hồ báo động y tế; Thiết bị cảnh báo y tế cá nhân
hu: Egészség és szépség > Egészségügyi ellátás > Egészségügyi riasztórendszerek: Ágyelhagyásjelző rendszerek; Gondozói hívórendszerek; Székelhagyásjelző rendszerek; Padlószőnyeg-riasztó rendszerek; Orvosi riasztóórák; Személyi orvosi vészjelzők
sk-SK: Zdravie a krása > Starostlivosť o zdravie > Zdravotnícke poplašné systémy: Alarmové systémy pri opustení postele; Pager systémy pre opatrovateľov; Alarmové systémy pri opustení stoličky; Alarmové systémy s podlahovou rohožou; Zdravotnícke alarmové hodinky; Osobné zdravotnícke núdzové zariadenia
sl-SI: Zdravje in lepota > Zdravje > Medicinski alarmni sistemi: Alarmni sistemi za izhod iz postelje; Pozivniški sistemi za negovalce; Alarmni sistemi za izhod iz stola; Alarmni sistemi s talnimi podlogami; Medicinske alarmne ure; Osebne medicinske alarmne naprave
lt-LT: Sveikata ir grožis > Sveikatos priežiūra > Medicininės signalizacijos sistemos: Atsikėlimo iš lovos signalizacijos sistemos; Slaugytojų iškvietimo sistemos; Atsikėlimo nuo kėdės signalizacijos sistemos; Grindų kilimėlio signalizacijos sistemos; Medicininiai signalizacijos laikrodžiai; Asmeniniai medicininiai įspėjimo prietaisai
sv: Skönhet och hälsa > Hälsovård > Medicinska larmsystem: Sänglarmsystem; Personsökaresystem för vårdgivare; Stollarmsystem; Golvmattalarmsystem; Medicinska larmklockor; Personliga medicinska larmenheter
nl: Gezondheid en persoonlijke verzorging > Gezondheidszorg > Medische alarmsystemen: Bed verlaat alarmsystemen; Zorgverlener pager systemen; Stoel verlaat alarmsystemen; Vloermat alarmsystemen; Medische alarm horloges; Persoonlijke medische alarm apparaten
ja: 美容・健康 > ヘルスケア > 個人向け緊急対応システム: ベッド離床アラームシステム; 介護者用ページャーシステム; 椅子離床アラームシステム; フロアマットアラームシステム; 医療用アラーム腕時計; 個人用医療アラート機器
ro-RO: Sănătate și frumusețe > Îngrijirea sănătății > Sisteme de alarmă medicală: Sisteme de alarmă pentru ieșirea din pat; Sisteme de pager pentru îngrijitori; Sisteme de alarmă pentru ieșirea din scaun; Sisteme de alarmă cu covorașe pentru podea; Ceasuri de alarmă medicală; Dispozitive personale de alertă medicală
nb: Skjønnhet og helse > Helsestell > Medisinske alarmsystemer: Sengeutgangsalarmesystemer; Personsøkersystemer for omsorgspersoner; Stolutgangsalarmesystemer; Gulvmattealarmesystemer; Medisinske alarmklokker; Personlige medisinske varslingsenheter
zh-TW: 保健與美容 > 健康照護 > 醫療警報系統: 床位警報系統; 照顧者傳呼機系統; 椅子警報系統; 地墊警報系統; 醫療警報手錶; 個人醫療警報裝置
en: Health & Beauty > Health Care > Medical Alarm Systems: Bed Exit Alarm Systems; Caregiver Pager Systems; Chair Exit Alarm Systems; Floor Mat Alarm Systems; Medical Alarm Watches; Personal Medical Alert Devices
el: Υγεία & ομορφιά > Φροντίδα υγείας > Ιατρικά συστήματα συναγερμού: Συστήματα συναγερμού εξόδου από κρεβάτι; Συστήματα ειδοποίησης φροντιστή; Συστήματα συναγερμού εξόδου από καρέκλα; Συστήματα συναγερμού δαπέδου; Ρολόγια ιατρικού συναγερμού; Προσωπικές συσκευές ιατρικού συναγερμού